tables/No-No-g3.ctb
begword grupp 1245-1234									# level 3 contractions
endword grupp 1245-1234
begword gruppa 1245-1234-1
endword gruppa 1245-1234-1
begword gruppe 1245-1234-15
endword gruppe 1245-1234-15
begword gruppeè 1245-1234-15-2346
endword gruppeè 1245-1234-15-2346
begword gruppã 1245-1234-126
endword gruppã 1245-1234-126
begword gruppû 1245-1234-156
endword gruppû 1245-1234-156						# level 3 contractions

word går 1245-1235								
word gått 1245-2345											# level 3 contractions

word heldig 125-145											# level 3 contractions
word uheldig 136-125-145
begword heldig 125-145									# level 3 contractions
begword uheldig 136-125-145

endword het 236													# level 3 contractions
endword hetã 236-126
endword hetû 236-156
endword heteè 236-15-2346

# word hun 136										# already in level 1
# hverandre												# defined in level 2
begword hwor 2345												# level 3 contractions

endword ing 25-24												# level 3 contractions
endword inga 25-24-1
endword ingaè 25-24-1-2346

endword inge 26-24											# level 3 contractions
word istedenfor 24-356-1246
word jamvel 245-1236
endword leg 25-1245
endword lege 26-1245
endword lig 25-123
endword lige 26-123

# word mange 134										# defined in level 1 contractions
# word manges 134-234								# defined in level 2 contractions
# word med 146											# defined in level 1 contractions
# word meg 134-1245									# defined in level 2 contractions
# word meget 134-346								# -
# word mellom 134-123								# -

endword ment 25-2345										# level 3 contractions
endword menta 25-2345-1  								# level 3 contractions
endword mente 26-2345
endword messig 25-134
endword messige 26-134

# word min 134-1345									# defined in level 2 contractions

endword nad 25-1246											# level 3 contractions
endword nade 26-1246										# level 3 contractions

# word natur 1345-2345							# defined in level 2 contractions
begword unatur 136-1345-2345						# level 3 contractions

word naturligvis 1345-2345-1236

# word nedenfor 1345-1246						# defined in level 2 contractions
# word nedenfra 1345-124            # defined in level 2 contractions
word nemlig 1345-123				
# word neppe 1345-1234							# defined in level 2 contractions
word nettopp 1345-2345-1234
# begword noen 1345-1345						# defined in level 2 contractions
word noenlunde 1345-1345-123
word noensinne 1345-1345-234
# word noko 1345-13									# defined in level 2 contractions
# word nokon 1345-13-1345						# defined in level 2 contractions
# word nokre 1345-13-12356					# defined in level 2 contractions

word nødvendig 136											# level 3 contractions
word nødvendignv 136-1345-1236
begword nødvendignv 136-1345-1236


# word når 1345										# defined in level 2 contractions

# word og 14											# defined in level 1
# word også												# defined in level 1

word omkring 135-134-13											# level 3 contractions
word omtrent 135-134-2345

# word oss												# defined in level 1
# word og 14											# defined in level 1
# word også												# defined in level 1
# word oss												# defined in level 1
# word ovenfor 135-1246						# defined in level 2 contractions
# word ovenfra 135-124						# defined in level 2 contractions
# word over												# defined in level 1
# over														# defined in level 2 contractions
# begword overgang 1346-1245-1245 # defined in level 2 contractions

always pakk 1234-13												# level 3 contractions
word plutselig 1234-25-123
begword pr 25

# always punkt 1234-13-2345				# defined in level 2 contractions
# word på 1234										# defined in level 1
# re															# defined in level 2 contractions

word riktig 136													# level 3 contractions
word riktigrg 136-125-1245
begword riktig 136
begword riktigrg 136-125-1245						# level 3 contractions

endword sam 25-146											# level 3 contractions
endword samt 25-46-2345
endword same 26-146											# level 3 contractions

# word samme 234-134							# defined level 2 contractions
# sammen													# defined level 2 contractions

begword sannsyn 234-234									# level 3 contractions
begword usannsyn 136-234-234
begword sannsynleg 234-234-25-1245
begword usannsynleg 136-234-234-25-1245
begword sannsynlig 234-234-25-123
begword usannsynlig 136-234-234-25-123
word sannsynligvis 234-234-1236					# level 3 contractions

# word seg 234-1245								# defined level 2 contractions
# word selv 234-1236							# defined level 2 contractions

word sidan 234-145											# level 3 contractions
word simpelthen 234-1234-125

# word sin 234-1345								# defined level 2 contractions
# word sitt 234-2345							# defined level 2 contractions

word sjeldan 234-245-145								# level 3 contractions
word sjelden 234-245-145-126
word sjeldne 234-245-145-2346
endword sjon 25-1345
endword sjonaè 25-1345-1-2346
endword sjone 26-1345										# level 3 contractions

# word sjøl 234-245								# defined level 2 contractions
# sjølv														# defined level 2 contractions
begword sk 2356
endword sk 2356
# word skal 123456								# defined level 2 contractions
endword skap 25-1234
endword skape 26-1234
begword skr 123456
# word skulla 123456-1						# defined level 2 contractions
# word skulle 123456-15						# defined level 2 contractions
# word skullet 123456-346					# defined level 2 contractions
# word snart 234-1235							# defined level 2 contractions
# word som 234										# defined in level 1

endword som 25-234											# level 3 contractions
endword somt 25-234-2345
endword somme 26-234
begword sp 356													# level 3 contractions

# always spørsmål 234-1234-134		# defined level 2 contractions

begword st 356													# level 3 contractions
word takk 2345-13
begword utakk 136-2345-13								# level 3 contractions

# word tatt 2345-2345							# defined level 2 contractions

word te 2345														# level 3 contractions
begword ute 136-2345
endword ute 136-2345
begword tes 2345-234
endword tes 2345-234
word temmelig 2345-134									# level 3 contractions

word vedtatt 1236-2345-2345							# level 3 contractions
word verken 1236-13
endword vis 25-1236
endword vist 25-1236										# level 3 contractions

# word viss 1236-234							# defined level 2 contractions
# word uviss 136-1236-234					# defined level 2 contractions

# --------------------- End level 3 contracions ---------------------------
